en: Valet organizer features: Built-in compartments; Coin dish; Cord management; Drawer; Hidden drawer; Key tray; Lockable lid; Mirror; Phone stand; Removable tray; Ring holder; USB hub; Watch cushion; Wireless charging pad; Other
tr: Çekmece düzenleyici özellikleri: Dahili bölmeler; Bozuk para tabağı; Kablo düzenleyici; Çekmece; Gizli çekmece; Anahtarlık tepsisi; Kilitlenebilir kapak; Ayna; Telefon standı; Çıkarılabilir tabla; Yüzük askısı; USB hub; Saat yastığı; Kablosuz şarj pedi; Diğer
ko: 발렛 정리함 특징: 내장 수납공간; 동전 수납칸; 코드 관리; 서랍; 비밀 서랍; 키 트레이; 잠금식 뚜껑; 거울; 휴대폰 거치대; 탈착식 트레이; 링홀더; USB 허브; 시계 쿠션; 무선 충전 패드; 기타
vi: Đặc điểm của khay để đồ cá nhân: Có ngăn trong; Đĩa đựng tiền xu; Quản lý dây cáp; Ngăn kéo; Ngăn kéo bí mật; Khay đựng chìa khóa; Nắp có khóa; Gương; Giá đỡ điện thoại; Khay có thể tháo rời; Giá đỡ nhẫn; Bộ chia USB; Gối kê đồng hồ; Đế sạc không dây; Khác
zh-TW: 隨身物品收納功能: 內建隔間; 硬幣盤; 理線; 抽屜; 隱藏式抽屜; 鑰匙托盤; 可上鎖蓋子; 鏡面; 手機支架; 可拆托盤; 戒指架; USB 集線器; 手錶墊; 無線充電座; 其他
bg-BG: Характеристики на органайзер за аксесоари: Вградени отделения; Чиния за монети; Организиране на кабели; Чекмедже; Скрито чекмедже; Поставка за ключове; Заключващ се капак; Огледало; Стойка за телефон; Тавичка, която може да се премахва; Пръстен държач; USB хъб; Възглавница за часовник; Подложка за безжично зареждане; Друго
hu: Asztali rendszerező funkciói: Beépített rekeszek; Érmetál; Kábelkezelés; Fiókos; Rejtett fiók; Kulcstartó; Zárható fedél; Tükör; Telefonállvány; Kivehető tálca; Gyűrűs tartó; USB elosztó; Órapárna; Vezeték nélküli töltőpad; Egyéb
da: Opbevaringsorganisators funktioner: Indbyggede rum; Møntskål; Ledningshåndtering; Skuffe; Skjult skuffe; Nøglebakke; Låsbart låg; Spejl; Telefonholder; Aftagelig bakke; Ringholder; USB-hub; Urpude; Trådløs opladningsflade; Andet
sv: Specifikationer för valetsorganisatör: Inbyggda fack; Myntfat; Sladdhantering; Låda; Dold låda; Nyckelbricka; Låsbart lock; Spegel; Telefonstativ; Avtagbar bricka; Ringhållare; USB-hubb; Klockkudde; Sladdlös laddningspad; Annat
nl: Kenmerken kledingstandaard/valet: Ingebouwde compartimenten; Muntenschaal; Kabelbeheer; Lade; Verborgen lade; Sleutelbak; Afsluitbaar deksel; Spiegel; Telefoonstandaard; Uitneembare tray; Ringhouder; USB-hub; Horlogekussen; Draadloos oplaadpad; Overig
hr-HR: Značajke organizatora držača: Ugrađeni pretinci; Posuda za kovanice; Organizacija kabela; Ladica; Skrivena ladica; Ladica za ključeve; Poklopac koji se može zaključati; Ogledalo; Stalak za telefon; Uklonjiv pladanj; Držač prsten; USB čvorište; Jastučić za sat; Podložak za bežično punjenje; Ostalo
sl-SI: Značilnosti polnilnega stojala z organizatorjem: Vgrajeni predelki; Posoda za kovance; Upravljanje s kabli; Predal; Skriti predal; Predal za ključe; Zaklepljiv pokrov; Zrcalno; Stojalo za telefon; Odstranljivi pladenj; Obročasti držalec; USB zvezdišče; Blazina za uro; Brezžična polnilna blazina; Druga
fi: Henkilökohtaisten tavaroiden järjestelytelineen ominaisuudet: Sisäänrakennetut osastot; Kolikkoastia; Johtojen hallinta; Vetolaatikko; Piilotettu laatikko; Näppäinlokero; Lukittava kansi; Peili; Puhelinteline; Irrotettava tarjotin; Sormuspidin; USB-keskitin; Kellon tyyny; Langaton lataus; Muu
de: Organizer-Eigenschaften: Eingebaute Fächer; Münzschale; Kabelorganisierer; Schublade; Versteckte Schublade; Schlüsselablage; Abschließbarer Deckel; Spiegel; Handyhalterung; Herausnehmbares Tablett; Ringhalter; USB-Hub; Uhrenkissen; Kabelloses Ladepad; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Vlastnosti organizéra vešiakov: Vstavané priehradky; Organizér na mince; Správa káblov; Zásuvkový; Skrytá zásuvka; Organizér na kľúče; Uzamykateľné veko; Zrkadlový; Stojan na telefón; Vyberateľný podnos; Krúžkový držiak; USB hub; Vankúšik na hodinky; Podložka na bezdrôtové nabíjanie; Iné
pl: Charakterystyka organizera na przedmioty podręczne: Wbudowane przegrody; Pojemnik na monety; Organizacja kabli; Szuflada; Ukryta szuflada; Tacka na klucze; Zamykana pokrywa; Lusterko; Podstawka na telefon; Wyjmowana tacka; Uchwyt na pierścionki; Hub USB; Poduszka na zegarek; Bezprzewodowa ładowarka; Inne
el: Χαρακτηριστικά οργανωτή valet: Ενσωματωμένες θήκες; Δίσκος κερμάτων; Διαχείριση καλωδίου; Συρτάρι; Κρυφό συρτάρι; Θήκη κλειδιών; Καπάκι που κλειδώνει; Καθρέφτης; Βάση τηλεφώνου; Με αφαιρούμενο δίσκο; Δακτύλιος συγκράτησης; Διανομέας USB; Μαξιλάρι ρολογιού; Ασύρματη βάση φόρτισης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 衣物配件收纳用品的特点: 内置隔层; 硬币托盘; 线缆管理; 抽屉; 隐藏抽屉; 钥匙托盘; 可锁盖; 镜子; 手机支架; 可拆卸托盘; 指环支架; USB 集线器; 手表垫枕; 无线充电板; 其他
cs: Vlastnosti organizéru na osobní doplňky: Vestavěné přihrádky; Miska na mince; Přihrádka na kabely; Zásuvka; Skrytá zásuvka; Přihrádka na klíče; Uzamykatelné víko; Zrcadlo; Držák telefonu; Odnímatelný tácek; Držák na prsteny; USB hub; Polštářek na hodinky; Podložka pro bezdrátové nabíjení; Jiné
ja: バレーオーガナイザーの機能: コンパートメント内蔵; コイン皿; コード管理; 引き出し; 隠し引き出し; キートレイ; ロック可能なふた; ミラー; 電話スタンド; 取り外し可能トレイ; リングホルダー; USBハブ; 時計クッション; ワイヤレス充電パッド; その他
pt-PT: Características do organizador de valet: Compartimentos integrados; Prato para moedas; Gestão de cabos; Gaveta; Gaveta oculta; Bandeja de chaves; Tampa com fecho; Espelho; Suporte para telemóvel; Bandeja removível; Suporte de anel; Hub USB; Almofada de relógio; Base de carregamento sem fios; Outro
th: คุณลักษณะของที่แขวนกุญแจสำหรับจอดรถ: มีช่องเก็บของในตัว; ถาดใส่เหรียญ; ระบบจัดเก็บสายไฟ; ลิ้นชัก; ช่องเก็บของแบบซ่อน; ถาดใส่กุญแจ; ฝาปิดล็อกได้; กระจก; ที่วางโทรศัพท์; ถาดรองถอดได้; ที่จับแบบแหวน; ฮับ USB; เบาะรองนาฬิกา; แพ็ดชาร์จแบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
nb: Skuffeorganisator-funksjoner: Innebygde rom; Myntskål; Ledningshåndtering; Skuff; Skjult skuff; Nøkkelbrett; Låsbart lokk; Speil; Telefonstativ; Avtakbart brett; Ringholder; USB-hub; Klokkepute; Trådløs ladeplate; Annet
lt-LT: Aksesuarų organizatoriaus savybės: Įmontuoti skyreliai; Monetų lėkštė; Laidų tvarkymas; Stalčius; Paslėptas stalčius; Raktų dėklas; Užrakinamas dangtis; Veidrodinis; Telefono stovas; Išimamas padėklas; Žiedo formos laikiklis; USB šakotuvas; Laikrodžio pagalvėlė; Belaidis įkrovimo kilimėlis; Kita
it: Caratteristiche del vassoio caricabatterie: Scomparti incorporati; Piatto per monete; Gestione dei cavi; Cassetto; Cassetto nascosto; Vassoio portachiavi; Coperchio bloccabile; Specchio; Supporto per telefono; Vassoio removibile; Porta anello; Hub USB; Cuscino per orologio; Base di ricarica wireless; Altro
pt-BR: Características do organizador de cabideiros: Compartimentos integrados; Prato para moedas; Organização de cabos; Gaveta; Gaveta oculta; Bandeja para chaves; Tampa com trava; Espelho; Suporte para celular; Bandeja removível; Suporte de anel; Hub USB; Almofada para relógio; Base de carregamento sem fio; Outro
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale organizatorului valet: Cu compartimente încorporate; Tavă de monede; Organizarea cablurilor; Sertar; Sertar ascuns; Tavă pentru chei; Capac cu încuietoare; Oglindă; Suport de telefon; Cu tavă detașabilă; Suport de inele; Hub USB; Pernă de ceas; Încărcător wireless; Altele
ru: Характеристики органайзера: Встроенные отсеки; Монетница; Органайзер для кабелей; Выдвижной ящик; Потайной ящик; Лоток для ключей; Крышка с замком; Зеркало; Подставка для телефона; Съемный лоток; Подставка для колец; USB-концентратор; Подушечка для часов; Панель беспроводной зарядки; Другое
fr: Caractéristiques de l’organisateur de charge: Compartiments intégrés; Coupelle à pièces; Gestion des câbles; Tiroir; Tiroir caché; Plateau à clés; Couvercle verrouillable; Miroir; Support de téléphone; Plateau amovible; Support anneau; Concentrateur USB; Coussin de montre; Socle de chargement sans fil; Autre
es: Características del organizador de guardarropa: Compartimentos incorporados; Plato de monedas; Gestión de cables; Cajón; Cajón oculto; Bandeja de llaves; Tapa con cerradura; Espejo; Soporte para teléfono; Bandeja extraíble; Soporte de anillo; Concentrador USB; Acolchado; Almohadilla de carga inalámbrica; Otros